Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 14 Storage of Water for Industrial and Municipal Uses

§ 41-14-101.
Definitions.

When used in this act [§§

41-14-101

through

41-14-103

], unless the context otherwise requires, “board” means the Wyoming natural resource board [economic development and stabilization board], “director” means the director of the natural resource board, and “chief” means chief of the water development division of the natural resource board.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 190, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-529.

Natural resource board. —

The natural resource board has been abolished. The department of economic planning and development, the successor to the board, was in turn succeeded by the economic development and stabilization board.

Sections related to the economic development and stabilization board were repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

§ 41-14-102.
Contracts with United States for acquisition of space in the proposed Fontenelle Reservoir of the Seedskadee Project.

The board is hereby authorized to contract with the United States or its agent for the acquisition of space in the proposed Fontenelle Reservoir of the Seedskadee Project for the storage of water for municipal and industrial uses, to the extent the board determines necessary for beneficial use in the state of Wyoming, but not to exceed sixty thousand (60,000) acre-feet and to contract for the payment to the United States of not more than nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000.00) as the allocated costs thereof pursuant to the Federal Reclamation Laws and the Water Supply Act of 1958 (43 U.S.C. § 390b).

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 190, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-531.

§ 41-14-103.
Issuance of bonds; purchase of bonds by state treasurer; interest rates; when bonds due and payable; disposition of proceeds of sale; use of revenues derived from furnishing water.

The board is hereby authorized to issue its nonnegotiable debenture bonds in such numbers and amounts, not exceeding nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000.00), as may, from time to time, be required by it to carry out the provisions of this act [§§

41-14-101

through

41-14-103

]. The state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed, with the approval of the governor and the attorney general, to purchase such bonds for investment of the permanent funds of the state of Wyoming to the extent practicable. Such bonds issued by the board will bear interest at the rate of three percent (3%) per annum and will be payable on dates fixed by the board but not more than ten (10) years from the date of issue.

The funds obtained from the sale of said bonds provided for in subsection (a) of this section are hereby made available to the board to be used for the purposes of this act including, but not limited to the payment of any sums due to the United States for the repayment of the cost of construction of the space acquired by the board in the proposed Fontenelle Reservoir; its share of operation and maintenance of said reservoir and refunding of principal or interest of bonds issued by it.

All revenues derived from the furnishing of water for industrial or municipal purposes pursuant to this act shall be credited to a separate account. The board shall use any monies in this account for the repayment to the United States of the allocated cost of construction and operation and maintenance of the board’s acquired space in the Fontenelle Reservoir and for payment of interest and principal on its obligations prior to the use for such purposes of funds received by it from the sale of its bonds. All monies in this account in excess of those required for the board’s current operations under this act shall be applied to the retirement of the board’s debenture bonds purchased by the state treasurer.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 190, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 41-532; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund” in (c).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”